examples/apertium-hin.hin.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ॊऀँंःऄअआइईउऊऋऌऍऎएऐऑऒओऔकखगघङचछजझञटठडढणतथदधनऩपफबभमयरऱलळऴवशषसहऺऻ़ऽािीुूृॄॅॆेैॉॊोौ्ॎॏॐ॒॑॓॔ॕॖॗक़ख़ग़ज़ड़ढ़फ़य़ॠॡॢॣॱॲॳॴॵॶॷॸॹॺॻॼॽॾ</alphabet> 
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
  	<sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
	<sdef n="na"      c="Abstract noun"/>
  	<sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
  	<sdef n="al"     c="Altres"/>
  	<sdef n="cog"     c="Cognomen"/>	
  	<sdef n="top"     c="Topological"/>
  	<sdef n="subj"    c="subject"/>
  	<sdef n="org"     c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>     
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>    
    <sdef n="pers"     c="Personal"/>    
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="erg"     c="Ergative"/>        
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>        
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="abl"     c="Ablative"/>     
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>     
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>      
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>     
  	<sdef n="frm"	  c="formal"/>
  	<sdef n="fam"	  c="familiar"/>
	<sdef n="pol"	  c="polite"/>
	<sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive pronoun"/> 

    <sdef n="acc"      c="accusative"/>
    <sdef n="ins"      c="instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="loc"      c="Locative"/> 
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
	<sdef n="obj"     c="Objective"/>     

    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>        
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="adverbial conjunction"/>              
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>     
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>     
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>     
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine / Feminine"/> 
	<sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>        
    <sdef n="vaux"    c="Auxiliar verb"/>     
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>     
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>     
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / plural"/>        
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>     
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>        
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt"     c="Quantitative"/>            
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>        
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>      
    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>     
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>     
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>      
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>     
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>        
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>     
	<sdef n="impf"    c=" Imperfective participle"/>
	<sdef n="perf"     c="Perfective participle"/>     
	<sdef n="tv"     c="transitive"/>
	<sdef n="iv"     c="intransitive"/> 	
    <sdef n="prs"    c="Subjunctive"/>     
    <sdef n="fut"    c="Future"/>
	<sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/>
	<sdef n="gna"    c="verbal adverb"/>
  <sdef n="inj"     c="Interjection"/>
	<sdef n="agnt"    c="agentive"/>
	<sdef n="pri"    c="present indicative"/>	 	 
	<sdef n="stem"  c="stem"/>
	<sdef n="ord"  c="ordinal"/>
	<sdef n="percent"  c="Percent"/>
  <sdef n="mfn"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"/>


    <sdef n="cm"         c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"       c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"       c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"       c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"      c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"      c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"       c="Hyphen"/>

  </sdefs>    
      
 <pardefs>	      

	<!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->      
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>([५६७८९]|[१२३४५६७८९][०१२३४५६७८९]+)</re><p><l><b/>वाँ</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!।॥]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="__abbr">
      <!-- etc -->
      <e>     <p><l>इ</l><r>इ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>इ.</l><r>इ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>आदी</l><r>इ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      
      <!-- doctor -->
      <e>     <p><l>डॉ</l><r>डॉ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>डॉ.</l><r>डॉ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- km -->
      <e>     <p><l>किमी</l><r>किमी.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>किमी.</l><r>किमी.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- father -->
      <e>     <p><l>फ्र</l><r>फ्र.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>फ्र.</l><r>फ्र.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- rupee -->
      <e>     <p><l>रु</l><r>रु.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>रु.</l><r>रु.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- pH (wot) -->
      <e>     <p><l>पीएच</l><r>पीएच.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>पीएच.</l><r>पीएच.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- EESVI -->
      <e>     <p><l>ई</l><r>ई.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई.</l><r>ई.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- SHREEMAN -->
      <e>     <p><l>श्री</l><r>श्री.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>श्री.</l><r>श्री.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- EESAA PURVI -->
      <e>     <p><l>ई<b/>पू</l><r>ई. पू.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई.<b/>पू</l><r>ई. पू.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="__inj">
      <e>     <p><l>ए</l><r>ए<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>अहा</l><r>अहा<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>शाबाश</l><r>शाबाश<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>धन्य</l><r>धन्य<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>हाँ</l><r>हाँ<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>जी हाँ</l><r>जी हाँ<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>वाह</l><r>वाह<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ओ हो</l><r>ओ हो<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>अरे</l><r>अरे<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>हाय</l><r>हाय<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>हे<b/>राम</l><r>हे राम<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>छ:ि</l><r>छ:ि<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>हट</l><r>हट<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>धत</l><r>धत<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>बाप<b/>रे</l><r>बाप रे<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>रे</l><r>रे<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ओ</l><r>ओ<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>     
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Postpositions -->  

    <!-- genitives -->
    <pardef n="__gen_endings">
        <e><p><l>का</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="का"><i></i><par n="__gen_endings"/></e>
    <e lm=","><i>,</i><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guio"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
